Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1033
Manicuring, defined.

Manicuring means the practice of performing any or all of the acts of cutting, shaping, trimming, polishing, coloring, tinting, cleansing, reshaping, or other similar cosmetic or sanitary acts on the natural fingernails or toenails of a person but does not include the practice of nail technology.

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 14;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-360.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 295.